Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3104
Severability.

If any provision of sections 29-3101 to 29-3106 or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of sections 29-3101 to 29-3106 which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of sections 29-3101 to 29-3106 are severable.

Laws 1969, c. 228, § 4, p. 853.